New Jersey, session 222, A2907.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Public utility means the same as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13. Smart meter means a metering device that employs smart meter technology to measure, record, and transmit utility usage data to both a public utility and a customer for billing and other purposes.  Smart meter shall include a basic hourly interval meter, a meter with one-way communication, and a real-time meter with built-in, two-way communication capable of recording and transmitting instantaneous utility usage data. b.    A public utility shall not impose upon or collect a fee from any person for not installing a smart meter in the persons place of residence. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.